Utah, session 2026, HB189.
Section 1. Section 53H-1-402 is amended to read:53H-1-402. Reports to and actions of the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee.(1)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following recurring reports are due to the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee:(a)the reports described in Sections 53H-1-502, 53H-1-503, and 53H-1-504;(b)the reports described in Section 53H-1-203 by the board on:(i)system wide responses to changing demographics and workforce; and(ii)the board's activities and performance against the board's goals and metrics;(c)the report described in Section 53H-5-205;(d)the report described in Section 53H-8-202 by the board on recommended appropriations for higher education institutions and the board, including the report described in Section 53H-11-406 by the board on the effects of offering nonresident partial tuition scholarships;(e)the report described in Section 53H-8-306 by the Department of Workforce Services and the Governor's Office of Economic Opportunity on targeted jobs;(f)the reports described in Section 53H-8-303 by the board on performance;(g)the report described in Section 53H-11-402 by the board on the Opportunity Scholarship Program;(h)the report described in 53H-13-309 regarding the talent advisory councils;(i)the report described in Section 53H-11-414 by the board on the Utah Promise Program;(j)the report described in Section 53H-6-202 by the board on an institution compensating a student athlete for the use of the student athlete's name, image, or likeness;(k)the report described in Section 53H-1-604 regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council; and(l)the report described in Section 53E-10-308 by the State Board of Education and board on student participation in the concurrent enrollment program.(2)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following occasional report is due to the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee:, the board's report regarding each institution's strategic reinvestment plan described in Section 53H-8-210.(3)In accordance with applicable provisions, the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee shall complete the following:(a)an appropriation recommendation described in Section 53H-1-504 regarding compliance with Subsections 53H-1-504(5) and (14); and(b)as required by Section 53H-8-304, the review of performance funding described in Section 53H-8-304.(4)In consultation with the board, the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee shall study a re-design of: (a)the performance funding model described in Chapter 8, Part 3, Performance Funding, to better ensure:(i)(a)institutional alignment with the statewide system of higher education and the institution's mission within the statewide system; and(ii)(b)investment in meeting localized and statewide workforce demands and securing post-graduation employment outcomes; and.(b)(5)enrollment-based funding, including,Beginning May 6, 2026, the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee shall ensure that all non-statutory performance and growth funding formulas that contribute to appropriations for technical colleges, funding distribution models that:(i)(a)include equivalent funding value for secondary and adult students; and(ii)(b)reflect the full responsibility of the technical college's statutorily-required services.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.